Massachusetts, session 194th, H4443.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 58A of chapter 31 of the General Laws or any
other general or special law to the contrary, no person shall be eligible to have their name
certified for original appointment to the position of firefighter or police officer in the city of
Haverhill if such person has reached their 40th birthday on the date of the entrance examination.
SECTION 2. This act shall only apply to competitive exams administered on or after the
effective date of this act.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1